tables/hyph_brl_da_dk.dic
yl2d5re1d
yld4r2
yld3re
yli4n5d
y1li
y2l3k2
ylke6s
yl2lo
yl1l
y1lo
yl2s1k
y2l1s
y1lu
y2m
ym2i1s4
y3mi
ymæ2l1k3
y3mæ
y3må
yn4d5r2
y4n1d
y3ne
yn3g4r4
y2ng
1yn2g5s4
yn2g1ø
y6n4s
yns1ta
yn3st
yn3s5v2
y2n1t2
y1o1c2
yo3g4
y2on
y1o2p
yo1ru
y1o1s
y2o1t
you3g4
yp4h4
y1p
y4p3la6n.
yp2l2
y3pla
y1r
y2r1a2f
yr1ag
yr1ak
y3ran
y3re
yr2el
y5r2en
y3ri
yri2e
y2r1or
y2r1p6
yr3s2a
y4r1s
yrs3an
2y1s
y4s1a
y5s2a1t
y2s2c2
y6s3ener
y5s2e
yse1ne
y1se5s
y5si4a
y3si
y4s1in
y2sk
y4ske1g
y3ske
y4s1k3l2
ys2k4ro
ysk2r4
y4s1k4v
y2s1l2
y4s1n4
y3so
y2s2o2p
ys1or
y3s4po
y2s2p4
ys2ta
y3st
y5s2te
y6st1e1g
ys3t2e3t2r4
ystet4
y4s4t3h4
y4s2to2f
y5stru
yst2r4
y4s2t3v
y2s3v2
y5sø
y2s1å
y1ta
y1te
y1t2h4
ythe3
y1ti
y1to
yt3r4
yt4ra
y6t2s2
yt3s1t2
y1tæ
y1tø
y2t1å
ytår6
y1u
2y1v
yv3ag
yv2a
yve2ra
y3ve
y2v1o
y4v3s2
yv1år
y1w
y1æ
1z
2z.
3za
zag4
z2a2g5s4
za3s
2z1b2
3ze
ze2a
ze2e
4z1en5s2e
ze6n2s
ze3ra
ze3r1un
ze1ru
z2eu4s1
zeu1
zfe5s
z1f
z3fe
z1g
3z2i
zi2a
zi4n1d4
zi2n1e3v2
zi1ne
z2i2ni
zi6n2s4
zi1o
2z1k2
z1l
2z1m
2z1n
5zo
zo2e
zo3f4
zo3p
zo4s2t
zo1s
z1r
2z3s4
z1t
z2ti
3zu1
z1u2d
2z1v
2z1w
3zy
2z2z
z4zu1
æ1a
æ2b2
æber1e1d
æ5be
æbe1re
æ3bj2
3æb3l2
æ4b5r4
æ4b5s2
æce4s1
æ1c2
æ5de
æ1d
æde2ran
æde1ra
æde4s1ti1m
æde2s
æde3st
2æ3di
æ3d2o
æ2d5r2
æd6ru
2æ1e
æ2f
æ3f2e
æ3f2l2
æf3te
æ2f1t
æf6t5s
æ2g1i
æg1l
æ2g3r4
æg5sk
æ2g4s1
æg6sk2r4
æg6t4s
æ2gt
2æ1i
2æk
æ1ka
æ5ke
æk3i
æk3j
æ2k1l2
æ4k3n2
æk3r4
æk3s1ko
æ6k1s
æk2sk
æk3s2l2
æk5s2ti
æk3st
æk4st3r4
æ1ku
æ3kv2a
æ1k2v
æk3vin
ækv2i
æk1æ
æ1la
æl1ag
æ2l1a2r1t
æl5d6r2
æ2l1d
æle5s
æ1le
æ1lo
æl4p4s
æ2l1p
æls2k
æ2l1s
æl4s1t
æ2l1t4
æl6t3s3
æ1lu
æl1un
æ2l2v4
æl4v2s3
æ1lå
æ2m
æ3m1a
æmi2e
æ3mi
æ6m3s2
æ3mø
æn3d2r2
æ4n1d
1æn3d1ri
æn6d2s4
ænd2s5l2
2æ5ne
æng5sk
æ2ng
æn2g4s1
æng3s4t
æn4sa
æ6n2s
æn4sk
æn4s1ta
æn3st
æ1o1
æ2p
æp3h4
æ3pi
æ3p2l2
æ3p2r2
æ3pæ
2æ6r.
ær1a
ærd6sk4
æ2r1d
ær6d2s
ærd2s2l2
ærd4st
æ4re1g
æ1re
æ4rej
ær2el
æ2r1e2ng
ær2er
ære1r1a
ære6ska
ære2s
ære3s2k
ære4skræ
ær2esk2r4
ære4s4p4
ær2e3st
ære4s2ta
ære4s1ti
ær4gi
æ4r1g
ær2g7s1
ærk6s3k
æ2r1k
ær6k1s
ærm4st2r4
æ4r1m
ær6m1s
ærm3st
æ4r1n4
ær1o
ær5s4a
æ4r1s
ær4s2il
ær3si
ær3s2m
ær4s5p4
ær5s3po
ær2ti
æ2r1t
ær6t4s
æ1ru
ær4v5s1
æ2r1v4
ær1ø
æ1rå
æ4s1ag
æ1s
æ3sa
æse3k
æ5s2e
æ1se2l5s
æ1se6n6s1
æse3ru
æse4r1un
æ1se5s2
æ2s1j
æs2k
æs3ka
æ5s4ka1b2
æs4kal
æ5ske
æsk3in
æsk2i
æ2s3ki1s
æs3k4la
æ4s1k2l2
æ2skog
æs1ko
æ5s3kon
æ2s3k4ra
æsk2r4
æs1lan
æ2sl2
æ3sla
æs3le
æs4pe
æ2s2p4
æ6s3s4
æs4te
æ3st
æ4stra
æst2r4
æst3ran
æ4st3ri
æ5s3tu1e
æ4s3t1v
æs2ty
æ4s1tæ
æ4stø
æs2t1ø1v
æ2s2v2
æs1ø1e
æ3sø
æ5søj
æ1ta
æ1t6e
æte2r
æte3ri
æt3h4
æ1t6i
æ1to
æt3r4
æt4ra
æ6t4s
æt3sl2
æt5sta
æt3st2
æt5sty
æt1u
æ1ty
æ1u6
æu2m4
æu6m1s1
æu2s3
æ2v
æ3v2i
æ4v4s1
ø1a
2ø2b2
ø3bj2
øb3l2
øb4s3o
ø4b1s1
øb5st2
øb6sti
øb6st2r4
øb7stru
øb7s2tø
ø2d
ø3da
ød1a1b2
ød1ag
ød1a1v
ødek4
ø3de
øde1ly6
øde2s6
ød1o
ød2o2m
ø6d5r2
ød5s2a
ø6d2s
ød4s2ko
ød3sk4
øds1ku
ød5s2kø
ød4s1l2
ød3s3ma
ød2s1m
øds3p2r2
ød2s2p4
øds2ta1b4
ød3st
øds1te2m
ød4sti
ød5s1t2j
øds1træ
ødst2r4
ød5su
ød3s3v2
øds1å
ø3du
ø1e
ø2e.
ø2e1g
2øen
ø2f
øf3l2
øg1ag
ø1ga
øg2na
ø2g1n
ø1g4r4
øg5sa
ø2g4s1
øg6s3e
øgsek4
øg5skæ
øg5s3l2
øg2s5p4
øg5st
2ø2gt
ø4g1u
2ø1gå
ø2h4
ø3he
ø1in
ø1i1s
ø2j1a
2øj1l6
øj2l2s1
øj3l1u
1ø2j1n
øj1o
ø2j2s
øj4sa
øj4si
øj3s1k
øj3s3ma
øj2s1m
øj4st
ø3ka
ø1ke
1ø1ko
ø1k2r4
1ø6k1s
ø1ku
1ø6l.
øl1ag
ø1lak
ø1lan
øl2ga
ø2l1g
2øl3li
øl1l
øl1o2p
øl4sa
ø2l1s
øl1se7s3
øl5s2e
ø1lu
øl3v4a
ø2l2v
øl4ve2m
øl3ve
øl4v3i
øl1æ
ø1lå
2ø2m
øm4s3i
ø6m1s
øm3s3v2
ø3mø
2ø6n.
ø2na
ønde2ra
ø4n1d
øn3de
øn3d2r2
øn5san
ø6n2s
øn3sa
øn3s1i
øn6s3i1d
øn2s3l2
øn4so
øn4s1ti1m
øn3st
øn4s2v2
2ø2n2t
øn3te
ønt3h4
øn3ti
ønt3r4
ø2nu
ø1o
ør3a
ør4a1p
ø2r2c2
ør2e1g
ø1re
ør2el
ø2r1en6d.
øre4n1d
ørge3ru
ø4r1g
ør1ge
ør6k3s
ø2r1k
ør2na
ø4r1n
ør1o
ør4s3ar
ø4r1s
ør3s2a
ør4si
ør2sk2r4
ør4sl2
ør4s2n4
ør4st2il
ør3st
ør5te
ø2r1t
ø1ru4
ør1æ
ø1rø
ør1å
ø2s
ø4sa
øs1ag
øse3r1ag
ø5s2e
øse1ra
ø4s2k3v
ø4s1l2
ø3s2p4
ø4s2t
ø6s2tar
ø1st1a1s
ø5ste
ø7sten
ø6st1eu1
ø5st2r4
ø6st3ro2m
øst3u
ø4s1ø3
ø1te
ø1ti
ø1to
ø1u
1øver3s2t
ø1v
ø3ve
øve4r1s
øve3r2u
ø2v3r2
ø1w
1øya
2å.
å1a
2å4b.
å1b2
åbe2n
å5be
åb2e4n1o
å3d2a
å1d
å4d1ej
å3de
åd3ru
åd2r2
åd4sa
å6d2s
åd4s1k2r4
åd3sk4
åd4s1kæ
å1e
å1g
åge5s
å1ge
å1j
å3k4
åke2
åker1
å1la
1ålak
åle2s6
å1le
åle5s5v2
ål1o
ål4s1a
å2l1s
ål4s1ken
ål3ske
ål3s1ko
ål4s2p4
ål4s1t
ål5st2r4
å1lu
å1ly
å1læ
ån2da
å4n1d
ån4de2n1t
ån3de
ån2do
ån4d2r2
ånds3ka
ån6d2s
ånd3sk4
ånd5sto
ånd3st
ånd4su
ån2d1ø
å1n6e
åne6d6s1
åne1d
ån2g5s1
å2ng
å6n4s
ån3sk2
ån3s1t
å1n4å
å1o
år1a
år2da
å2r1d
år4d1ej
år3de
år6d4s1
år6d2t
2å4r1n
å1ro
å4r4s1
år5s2a
års3a2f
år6s3e
års2kæ
år6s1m
år3s5p4
å1ru
å1ry
å1ræ
å1rø
år1ø.
å1s4
å1se5s2
å5s2e
ås5ka
å3sk2r4
ås5ni
å2s1n4
å3s2p4
å1t
åt3e1f
å2t3h4
å2t2v
åv2a3
å1v
